Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.085

Board of directors—Immunity.

Any member serving in their official capacity on the Washington state jail industries board, in either an appointed or advisory capacity, or either their employer or employers, or other entity that selected the members to serve, are immune from a civil action based upon an act performed in good faith.

[ 1995 c 154 s 5.]